Idaho, session 2026, S1344.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 56-202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-202. DUTIES OF DIRECTOR OF STATE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WEL-
FARE. (1) The director of the state department of health and welfare shall:
(a) Administer public assistance and social services to eligible peo-
ple;
(b) Promulgate, adopt and enforce such rules and such methods of admin-
istration as may be necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of title
56, Idaho Code, except as provided in section 56-203A, Idaho Code;
(c) Conduct research and compile statistics relating to public wel-
fare;
(d) Prepare for the governor and legislature an annual report of activ-
ities and expenditures; make such reports in such form and containing such
information as the federal government may from time to time require; and com-
ply with such provisions as the federal government may from time to time find
necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports;
(e) Cooperate with the federal government through its appropriate
agency or instrumentality in establishing, extending, and strengthening
services for the protection and care of homeless, dependent, and neglected
children, and children in danger of becoming delinquent; and to undertake
other services for children authorized by law;
(f) Cooperate with the federal government through its appropriate
agency or instrumentality in establishing and maintaining a comprehensive
system of in-home services as defined in section 67-5006, Idaho Code, de-
signed to assist older persons, as defined in section 67-5006, Idaho Code,
of Idaho to continue living in an independent and dignified home environment
and to undertake other services for older persons as authorized by law;
(g) Exercise the opt-out provision in section 115 of the personal re-
sponsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996, P.L. 104-193.
Consistent with this, the department may provide food stamps and services
funded under title 4A (including cash assistance, TANF supportive services


and at-risk payments) to a person who has been convicted of a felony involv-
ing a controlled substance as defined in chapter 27, title 37, Idaho Code, if
they comply with the terms of a withheld judgment, probation or parole.
(2) No later than July 1, 2028, the director shall complete the dis-
continuation of any program or service not expressly authorized by Idaho
Code. The director shall continuously monitor all department programs and
services to ensure statutory compliance and shall cease all new expenditures
for and complete the discontinuation of any program or service found to be
not expressly authorized by Idaho Code within sixty (60) days of such find-
ing.
(3) If the department expends funds for a program or service found to be
not expressly authorized by Idaho Code, the state controller shall:
(a) Immediately revoke the spending authority and revert all unex-
pended balances to the fund of origin upon a legal determination of a
lack of authorization;
(b) Reduce the department's maintenance appropriation for the follow-
ing fiscal year by the total amount of any funds, regardless of fund
source, disbursed for the unauthorized program or service prior to its
revocation; and
(c) Certify the amount of the unauthorized expenditure to the joint fi-
nance-appropriations committee of the legislature no later than Jan-
uary 15 of each year.
SECTION 2. That Section 56-203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-203. POWERS OF STATE DEPARTMENT. The state department shall have
the power to:
(1) Enter When authorized by Idaho Code, enter into contracts and
agreements with the federal government through its appropriate agency
or instrumentality whereby the state of Idaho shall receive federal
grants-in-aid or other benefits for public assistance or public welfare pur-
poses under any act or acts of congress heretofore or hereafter enacted;
(2) Cooperate with the federal government in carrying out the purposes
of any federal acts or programs authorized by Idaho Code pertaining to public
assistance or welfare services, and in other matters of mutual concern;
(3) Cooperate with county governments and other branches of government
and other agencies, public or private, in administering and furnishing pub-
lic welfare services authorized by Idaho Code;
(4) Enter into reciprocal agreements with other states relative to the
provisions of public assistance and welfare services to residents and non-
residents;
(5) Initiate and administer public assistance and social services
authorized by Idaho Code for persons with physical or mental disabilities;
(6) Establish such requirements of residence for public assistance un-
der this chapter as may be deemed advisable, subject to any limitations im-
posed in this chapter, including the requirements of lawful presence pur-
suant to section 67-7903, Idaho Code;
(7) Define persons entitled to medical assistance in such terms as will
meet requirements for federal financial participation in medical assistance
payments;


(8) Accept the legal custody of children committed to it by district
courts of this state under the child protective act, to provide protective
supervision as defined therein, to place children for adoption when such
children are in the legal custody of the state department and are legally
available for adoption, and to exercise consent to adoption when the author-
ity to do so is vested in the department by court order or legally authorized
parental relinquishment;
(9) Determine the amount, duration and scope of care and services to be
purchased as medical assistance on behalf of needy eligible individuals;
(10) Manage and operate the southwest Idaho treatment center at Nampa,
Idaho; and
(11) Manage and operate state hospital north at Orofino, Idaho; state
hospital south at Blackfoot, Idaho; and state hospital west at Nampa, Idaho.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 10, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-1011, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-1011. REPORT ON PROGRAMS AND AUTHORITIES. The department shall
submit a report to the health and welfare committees of the Idaho house of
representatives and the Idaho senate no later than December 1, 2026, con-
taining a comprehensive list of all programs operated or managed by the
department and the corresponding statutory authority that creates or other-
wise authorizes the program.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-3516, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3516. APPROPRIATION ACTS DEEMED FIXED BUDGETS -- RATE OF EXPENDI-
TURE. (1) Appropriation acts when passed by the legislature of the state of
Idaho, and spending authority made thereunder, whether the appropriation is
fixed or continuing, are fixed budgets beyond which state officers, depart-
ments, bureaus, and institutions may not expend.
(2) Moneys available to any agency from sources other than state mon-
eys, if not cognizable at the time when appropriations were made whether
state fiscal liability is increased or not, must have prior approval of the
administrator of the division of financial management and the board of ex-
aminers in order that moneys may be expended, except those moneys received
under such conditions that preclude approval by the administrator of the
division and/or the board of examiners. Receipts from the sale of capital
outlay items and insurance claim settlements may, with the approval of the
division of financial management, be included as an increase to an agency's
appropriation and must be identified at an account category level. Expendi-
ture of such receipts must be for capital outlay items, except in the case of
a sale of a motor vehicle, which, notwithstanding section 67-3511(3), Idaho
Code, may be transferred to operating expenditures with the approval of the
division of financial management.
(3) One state agency may bill another state agency for goods and ser-
vices, provided the billing agency receives prior approval in writing from
the billed agency or such billing is provided for by law. This process will
be known as interagency billing to which the following rules will apply:


(a) The state controller will treat interagency receipts as revenue and
not classify such revenue as a reduction of the expenditures of the re-
ceiving agency. Interagency billing credits for all moneys shall be de-
posited to the appropriate fund of that agency.
(b) Interagency receipts may be expended by the collecting agency to
the extent that authority to do so has been requested and approved by the
legislature through an appropriation.
(c) The agency billed for the goods and services shall classify, treat,
and account for such expenses in the same manner as if such expenses had
been paid by warrant and may encumber unexpended balances and may carry
forward the encumbered appropriation to liquidate known or anticipated
interagency billing expenses at the end of a fiscal year. The state
controller shall provide for the method of liquidation of these encum-
brances.
(4) State agencies selling goods, products, and services to another
state agency must use the interagency process detailed by subsection (3) of
this section. State agencies, departments, and institutions may sell goods,
products, and services to the public and/or other political entities. These
cash receipts may be expended according to the following rules:
(a) The state controller will classify these moneys as receipts.
(b) Receipts for all moneys shall be deposited to the appropriate fund
of that agency.
(c) The collecting agency may expend all such receipts only to the ex-
tent that authority to do so has been requested and approved by the leg-
islature through an appropriation, except receipts received by agen-
cies under the circumstances cited in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) No appropriation act shall be construed to create, extend, or imply
independent authorization in Idaho Code for any program, service, or activ-
ity. Every appropriation is contingent on such express authorization as may
be required by the specific title of Idaho Code governing the appropriating
agency.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.